Illinois, session 104th, SB361.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court Record and Document Accessibility Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 86/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Court 8Record and Document Accessibility Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-166, eff. 1-1-24.)